Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-542
Policy; one or more insurance carriers.

The requirements for a motor vehicle liability policy may be fulfilled by the policies of one or more insurance carriers which policies together meet such requirements.

Laws 1949, c. 178, § 42, p. 498.